Utah statutes.
63G-2-901.   Definitions -- Public associations subject to act.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Public association" means any association, organization, or society
whose members include elected or appointed public officials and for which
public funds are used or paid to the public association for membership dues or
for other support for the official's participation in the public association.
(b) (i)  "Public funds" means any money received by a public entity from
appropriations, taxes, fees, interest, or other returns on investment.
(ii)  "Public funds" does not include money donated to a public entity by a
person or entity.
(2)  The budget documents and financial statements of a public association
shall be released pursuant to a written request if 50% or more of the public
association's:
(a)  members are elected or appointed public officials from this state; and
(b)  membership dues or other financial support come from public funds from
this state.
